Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2509.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail of personal hygiene products to a purchaser or nonbusiness use of personal hygiene products by a purchaser, during the exclusion period. The department shall 12345678910111213141516171819202122 publish guidance on its publicly accessible Internet website on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:"Exclusion period" means the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause."Personal hygiene product" means bar soap, body wash, bath wipes, body lotions, toothbrushes, toothpaste, floss, mouthwash, shampoo, conditioner, scalp treatments, tampons, sanitary pads, liners, feminine wipes, razors, shaving cream, aftershave, face wash, acne treatments, moisturizer, deodorant and antiperspirant."Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2509PN3396 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617